Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4204.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 6101. (1) Chapters 1 through 8 of the food code are
incorporated by reference except as amended and modified as
follows:
(a) Where provisions of this act and rules specify different
requirements.
(b) Section 3-401.14 is modified to read as follows:
"3-401.14 Non-Continuous Cooking of Raw Animal Foods.
Raw animal foods that are cooked using a non-continuous
cooking process shall be:
RMH H00703'25 (H-1) 05kzfo


(A) Subject to an initial heating process that is no longer
than 60 minutes in duration;P
(B) Immediately after initial heating, cooled according to the
time and temperature parameters specified for cooked potentially
hazardous food (time/temperature control for safety food) under
paragraph 3-501.14(A);P
(C) After cooling, held frozen or cold, as specified for
potentially hazardous food (time/temperature control for safety
food) under paragraph 3-501.16(A)(2);P
(D) Prior to Before sale or service, cooked using a process
that heats all parts of the food to a time/temperature specified in
paragraph 3-401.11(A);P
(E) Cooled according to the time and temperature parameters
specified for cooked potentially hazardous food (time/temperature
control for safety food) under paragraph 3-501.14(A) if not either
hot held as specified under paragraph 3-501.16(A), served
immediately, or held using time as a public health control as
specified under section 3-501.19 after complete cooking;P and
(F) Stored as follows:
(1) After initial heating but prior to before cooking as
specified under paragraph (D) of this section, separate from ready-
to-eat foods as specified under paragraph 3-302.11;Pf and
(2) After initial heating, but prior to before complete
cooking, marked or otherwise identified as foods that must be
cooked as specified under paragraph (D) of this section prior to
before being offered for sale or service.Pf The food may be
identified in any effective manner provided that the marking system
is disclosed to the regulatory authority upon request.".
(c) Section 2-103.11(L) is modified to read as follows:
RMH H00703'25 (H-1) 05kzfo


"Employees are properly trained in food safety as it relates
to their assigned duties;Pf and".
(d) Section 6-501.115(B) is modified by the addition of
subparagraph (6) that reads as follows:
"(6) A dog that is controlled by a customer in a qualified
premises if all of the following apply:
(a) The qualified premises sells and serves only drinks.
(b) A health or safety hazard will not result from the
presence or activities of the dog.
(c) All of the following requirements are met:
(i) The qualified premises is maintained free of visible dog
hair, dog dander, and other dog-related waste and debris. The
qualified premises is cleaned and disinfected appropriately as
needed.
(ii) Surfaces contaminated by the waste created from a dog's
bodily functions are immediately cleaned and disinfected.
(iii) Equipment used to clean and that comes in contact with
waste from a dog's bodily functions is stored separate from all
other cleaning equipment and is not used for other cleaning
purposes.
(iv) All dog waste is disposed of at least daily outside of the
qualified premises in a covered waste receptacle.
(v) An employee who touches the dog or cleans waste from the
dog's bodily functions does not serve drinks or handle tableware
until the employee has washed the employee's hands.
(vi) The dog is not allowed on a seat, chair, or customer's
lap, or allowed to contact a tabletop, countertop, or similar
surface in the qualified premises.
(vii) The dog is not allowed to contact reusable tableware
RMH H00703'25 (H-1) 05kzfo


unless the tableware is dedicated for use by dogs and readily
distinguishable as such or is provided by the customer handling the
dog.
(viii) The dog is not allowed in an area where drinks are
prepared.
(ix) The dog is not unattended.
(x) The customer is 18 years of age or older.
(xi) The customer keeps the dog on a leash.
(d) The qualified premises may do any of the following:
(i) Determine the location and the amount of space designated
for a customer accompanied by a dog.
(ii) Establish a limit on the size and type of dog and any
other limitation relating to a customer's dog.
(iii) Deny entry or eject from the qualified premises a customer
and the customer's dog.".
(2) The director, by rule, may adopt any changes or updates to
the food code.
(3) The annexes of the food code are considered persuasive
authority for interpretation of the food code.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H00704'25) of the 103rd
Legislature is enacted into law.
Final Page
RMH H00703'25 (H-1) 05kzfo